Missouri, session 2026, HB3479.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 84.570, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 84.570, to read as follows:
84.570. 1. No person shall be appointed policeman or officer of police who shall
have been convicted of any offense, the punishment of which may be confinement in the state
penitentiary; nor shall any person be appointed who is not proven to be of good character, or
who is not proven to be a bona fide citizen of the United States, or who cannot read and write
the English language and who does not possess ordinary physical strength and courage, nor
shall any person be originally appointed to said police force who is less than twenty-one years
of age. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall have the sole authority to
determine conditions of employment for police officers pursuant to section 84.460.
2. In the interest of efficiency and public safety, law enforcement officers, as such
term is defined in 29 U.S.C. Section 630 or any successor statute, shall be separated from
service on the last day of the month in which the employee becomes sixty-five years of age or
reaches thirty-five years of creditable service, as such term is defined in subdivision (8) of
section 86.900, whichever occurs [later] first.
3. The board shall from time to time require open competitive examinations or tests
for determining the qualifications and fitness of all applicants for appointment to positions on
the police force. Such examinations and tests shall be practical and shall relate to matters
which fairly measure the relative fitness of the candidates to discharge the duties of the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3479 2
positions to which they seek to be appointed. Notice of such examinations and tests shall be
given not less than ten days in advance thereof by public advertisement in at least one
newspaper of general circulation in such city, and by posting notice in the police headquarters
building. A list of those qualifying in such examinations shall be established, listing those
qualified in order of rank. When an appointment is to be made, the appointment shall be
made from such eligible list.
4. The board shall also establish rules for:
(1) Temporary employment for not exceeding sixty days in the absence of any
eligible list;
(2) Hours of work of police employees and officers subject to the provisions of
section 84.510; and
(3) Attendance regulations and leaves of absence.
✔